Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska86-211
Unauthorized additional services; provider; duties.

(1) No telecommunications company shall initiate or bill additional telecommunications services not required by the commission to be offered and for which the subscriber did not explicitly request or subscribe. The providing telecommunications company shall initiate a refund of a charge or apply the charge as a credit to the subscriber's next monthly bill if (a) a charge is assessed on a per-use basis for a telecommunications service described in this subsection and (b) the subscriber notifies the providing telecommunications company that the subscriber did not utilize the telecommunications service or the subscriber did not authorize the utilization of the telecommunications service.

(2) If a providing telecommunications company receives a notification pursuant to subdivision (1)(b) of this section, the telecommunications company shall inform the subscriber of the ability to block the telecommunications service from future use by the subscriber and shall block the telecommunications service from future use by the subscriber if the subscriber so requests. If a subscriber requests that the company not block the service or later requests to have the block lifted, the subscriber shall be responsible for charges caused by the future utilization of the telecommunications service. The company shall not charge a recurring fee for blocking the telecommunications service.

Laws 1999, LB 150, § 11;

R.S.1943, (1999), § 86-1911;

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 73.